New Jersey, session 222, S2422.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 85 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-352) is amended to read as follows: 85.  a.  As part of the Main Street Recovery Finance Program, the authority shall provide grants to eligible small businesses from the Main Street Recovery Fund, subject to appropriation or the availability of federal funds provided that: (1)   the authority shall undertake a disparity study of the relative availability of capital and related banking resources for small businesses and microbusinesses that are women- and minority-owned business enterprises.  Grants awarded pursuant to the program may be used by an eligible small business for capital improvements or to cover operating expenses; (2)   and seven percent of such funds shall be made available to eligible small businesses that are owned and controlled by veterans and service-disabled veterans as defined at 15 U.S.C. s.632(q).  Grants awarded pursuant to the program may be used by an eligible small business for capital improvements or to cover operating expenses. The authority may dedicate up to 10 percent of the amount appropriated for the purposes of this section to provide technical assistance grants to for-profit or non-profit entities that are experienced in providing technical assistance services or to eligible microbusinesses to help such eligible microbusinesses in applying for the grants authorized under this section. b.    (1) A small business shall be eligible to receive a grant pursuant to this section if the small business demonstrates to the authority that: (a)   the small business has complied with all requirements for filing tax and information returns and for paying or remitting required State taxes and fees by submitting, as a part of the application, a tax clearance certificate, as described in section 1 of P.L.2007, c.101 (C.54:50-39); and (b)   each worker employed by the small business shall be paid not less than $15 per hour or 120 percent of the minimum wage fixed under subsection a. of section 5 of P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a4), whichever is higher, except an employee who customarily and regularly receives gratuities or tips shall be paid not less than 120 percent of the minimum wage. (2)   In addition to the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection, a small business shall be eligible to receive a grant pursuant to this subsection for capital improvements only if the small business demonstrates to the authority at the time of application that:        (a)        any capital improvement in excess of $50,000 and undertaken with grant funds shall comply with standards established by the authority in accordance with the green building manual prepared by the Commissioner of Community Affairs pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2007, c.132 (C.52:27D-130.6), regarding the use of renewable energy, energy-efficient technology, and non-renewable resources to reduce environmental degradation and encourage long-term cost reduction; and (b)   each worker employed to perform construction work in connection with a capital improvement undertaken with grant funds in excess of $50,000 shall be paid not less than the prevailing wage rate for the workers craft or trade, as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.). c.     An eligible small business seeking a grant pursuant to this section shall submit an application for approval to the authority in the form and manner prescribed in regulations adopted by the authority pursuant to the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). Before the board may consider an eligible small businesss application for grants, the authority shall confirm with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Department of Environmental Protection, and the Department of the Treasury whether the eligible small business is in substantial good standing with the respective department, or has entered into an agreement with the respective department that includes a practical corrective action plan for the eligible small business. The authority may also contract with an independent third party to perform a background check on the eligible small business. The eligible small business, or an authorized agent thereof, shall certify under the penalty of perjury that any information provided in the application required pursuant to this subsection is true. d.    Following approval of an application, but before the disbursement of grant funds, the authority shall require an eligible small business to enter into a grant agreement. The grant agreement shall specify the amount of the grant to be awarded the eligible small business and the frequency of payments. If the authority determines that an eligible small business made a material misrepresentation on the eligible small businesss grant application or the eligible small business has failed to comply with any requirement set forth in subsection b. of this section, then the small business shall return to the authority any grant awarded pursuant to this section. (cf: P.L.2021, c.160, s.41) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.